Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle D. Derivative Procedures.

§79-4-7.40.
Meaning of “derivative proceeding”, “shareholder” in subarticle.

In Sections 79-4-7.41 through 79-4-7.47:

“Derivative proceeding” means a civil suit in the right of a domestic corporation or, to the extent provided in Section 79-4-7.47, in the right of a foreign corporation.

“Shareholder” includes a beneficial owner whose shares are held in a voting trust or held by a nominee on the beneficial owner’s behalf.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 7.40; Laws, 1993, ch. 368, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

Chancellor erred by failing to transfer a dispute over contractual obligations to a circuit court because a former member did not bring most of the claims derivatively under Miss. Code Ann. § 79-4-7.40 since he was seeking a personal recovery, and the proper procedures were not followed; moreover, the parties would have been deprived of the right to a jury trial if transfer was not obtained. ERA Franchise Sys. v. Mathis, 931 So. 2d 1278, 2006 Miss. LEXIS 337 (Miss. 2006).

In an action by a savings and loan association against a former vice-president and members of the board of directors for $26 million dollars in damages for alleged breach of fiduciary duty in the management of the association, the trial court properly rejected the defendants’ contention that the suit was barred due to the acquisition of the association by a successor corporation where the written bill of sale and assignment had the effect of transferring and assigning unto the successor corporation all properties, assets and choses in action of every kind and nature, including the present action. Liberty Sav. & Loan Asso. v. Mitchell, 398 So. 2d 208, 1981 Miss. LEXIS 2003 (Miss. 1981).

Allowance of punitive damages in stockholder’s derivative action.
67 A.L.R.3d 350.

Right of corporation to discharge employee who asserts right as stockholder.
84 A.L.R.3d 1107.

Negligence, nonfeasance, or ratification of wrongdoing as excusing demand on directors as prerequisite to bringing of stockholder’s derivative suit on behalf of corporation.
99 A.L.R.3d 1034.

Propriety of termination of properly initiated derivative action by “independent committee” appointed by board of directors whose actions (or inaction) are under attack.
22 A.L.R.4th 1206.

Construction, as to terms and conditions, of state statute or rule providing for voluntary dismissal without prejudice upon such terms and conditions as state court deems proper.
34 A.L.R.4th 778.

Attorneys’ fees: cost of services provided by paralegals or the like as compensable element of award in state court.
73 A.L.R.4th 938.

Notice to shareholders and court approval of dismissal or compromise of derivative actions, under
Rule 23.1 of Federal Rules of Civil Procedure.26 A.L.R. Fed. 465.

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1934,
1935 et seq.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Forms 161 et seq., 191 et seq., 201 et seq., 221 et seq., 354, 441.

11A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Federal Practice and Procedure, Forms 2051 et seq.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 612-627.

DuBose, Whose corporation is it, anyway? Abolishing the futility exception in derivative litigation.
12 Miss. C. L. Rev. 197, Fall, 1991.

§79-4-7.41.
Who may commence or maintain derivative proceeding.

A shareholder may not commence or maintain a derivative proceeding unless the shareholder:

Was a shareholder of the corporation at the time of the act or omission complained of or became a shareholder through transfer by operation of law from one who was a shareholder at that time; and

Fairly and adequately represents the interests of the corporation in enforcing the right of the corporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 368, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

Derivative proceeding defined for purposes of this subarticle, see § 79-4-7.40.

Son lacked standing to bring suit on behalf of closely held corporations because the injury for which he sought relief pertained to the corporations only; the son’s objection to the closing of the decedent’s estate was a shareholder derivative claim because the son was seeking solely to enforce a putative corporate right, and the son failed to satisfy the statutory conditions required of shareholder derivative actions. Ware v. Ware (In re Estate of Ware), 238 So.3d 613, 2018 Miss. LEXIS 86 (Miss. 2018).

§79-4-7.42.
Prerequisites to commencing derivative proceeding.

No shareholder may commence a derivative proceeding until:

A written demand has been made upon the corporation to take suitable action; and

Ninety (90) days have expired from the date delivery of the demand was made unless the shareholder has earlier been notified that the demand has been rejected by the corporation or unless irreparable injury to the corporation would result by waiting for the expiration of the ninety-day period.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 368, § 5; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 13, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, added “delivery of” preceding “the demand was made unless the shareholder” in (2).

Derivative proceeding defined for purposes of this subarticle, see § 79-4-7.40.

Miss. Code Ann. § 79-4-7.42 is unambiguous and does not contain an exception for futility. Speetjens v. Malaco Inc., 929 So. 2d 303, 2006 Miss. LEXIS 269 (Miss. 2006).

Shareholders alleged that a corporation’s directors breached their fiduciary duties, usurped corporate opportunities, and awarded themselves excessive salaries and extravagant bonuses; their derivative suit against the corporation and directors was properly dismissed because, before filing suit, they failed to make a written demand on the corporation to take suitable action, as required by Miss. Code Ann. § 79-4-7.42, and that statute did not contain an exception for futility. Speetjens v. Malaco Inc., 929 So. 2d 303, 2006 Miss. LEXIS 269 (Miss. 2006).

Sister had standing to assert corporate claims because (1) the subject corporations were closely held, (2) the sister’s accounting and dissolution claims were direct actions, and (3) the sister’s fiduciary breach claims were properly considered as direct actions, since no creditors were prejudiced, there was no risk of multiple suits, and the claims did not interfere with the fair distribution of a recovery. Scafidi v. Hille, 180 So.3d 634, 2015 Miss. LEXIS 603 (Miss. 2015).

Son lacked standing to bring suit on behalf of closely held corporations because the injury for which he sought relief pertained to the corporations only; the son’s objection to the closing of the decedent’s estate was a shareholder derivative claim because the son was seeking solely to enforce a putative corporate right, and the son failed to satisfy the statutory conditions required of shareholder derivative actions. Ware v. Ware (In re Estate of Ware), 238 So.3d 613, 2018 Miss. LEXIS 86 (Miss. 2018).

Negligence, nonfeasance, or ratification of wrongdoing as excusing demand on directors as prerequisite to bringing of stockholder’s derivative suit on behalf of corporation.
99 A.L.R.3d 1034.

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1959 et seq.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Forms 161 et seq. (complaints and other forms, shareholders’ derivative actions).

§79-4-7.43.
Stay of proceeding when corporation inquires into allegations.

If the corporation commences an inquiry into the allegations made in the demand or complaint, the court may stay any derivative proceeding for such period as the court deems appropriate.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 368, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

This section, not foreign law, to govern matters arising hereunder in derivative proceeding involving foreign corporation, see § 79-4-7.47.

§79-4-7.44.
Determination by independent directors or independent persons whether maintenance of proceeding is in best interests of corporation.

A derivative proceeding shall be dismissed by the court on motion by the corporation if one of the groups specified in subsection (b) or (f) has determined in good faith, after conducting a reasonable inquiry upon which its conclusions are based, that the maintenance of the derivative proceeding is not in the best interests of the corporation.

Unless a panel is appointed pursuant to subsection (e), the determination in subsection (a) shall be made by:

A majority vote of qualified directors present at a meeting of the board of directors if the qualified directors constitute a quorum; or

A majority vote of a committee consisting of two (2) or more qualified directors appointed by majority vote of qualified directors present at a meeting of the board of directors, regardless of whether such qualified directors constitute a quorum.

If a derivative proceeding is commenced after a determination has been made rejecting a demand by a shareholder, the complaint shall allege with particularity facts establishing either (1) that a majority of the board of directors did not consist of qualified directors at the time the determination was made or (2) that the requirements of subsection (a) have not been met.

If a majority of the board of directors consisted of qualified directors at the time the determination was made, the plaintiff shall have the burden of proving that the requirements of subsection (a) have not been met; if not, the corporation shall have the burden of proving that the requirements of subsection (a) have been met.

Upon motion by the corporation, the court may appoint a panel of one or more individuals to make a determination whether the maintenance of the derivative proceeding is in the best interests of the corporation. In such case, the plaintiff shall have the burden of proving that the requirements of subsection (a) have not been met.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 368, § 7; Laws, 2006, ch. 429, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

In subsection (a) there is a reference to “subsection (b) or (f)” although there is no subsection (f) in this section. The section is set out above as enacted by Section 8 of Chapter 368, Laws of 1993.

The 2006 amendment substituted “qualified directors” for “independent directors” throughout the section; substituted “regardless of whether such qualified directors constitute a quorum” for “whether or not such independent directors constituted a quorum” in (b)(2); repealed former (c), which read: “(c) None of the following shall by itself cause a director to be considered not independent for purposes of this section:
(1) The nomination or election of the director by persons who are defendants in the derivative proceeding or against whom action is demanded;
(2) The naming of the director as a defendant in the derivative proceeding or as a person against whom action is demanded; or
(3) The approval by the director of the act being challenged in the derivative proceeding or demand if the act resulted in no personal benefit to the director.”; redesignated former (d) through (f) as (c) through (e); rewrote (d); in the first sentence in (e), added “Upon motion by the corporation” at the beginning, and substituted “appoint a panel of one or more individuals” for “appoint a panel of one or more independent persons upon motion by the corporation”; and made minor stylistic changes.

Qualified director defined, see § 79-4-1.43.

Derivative proceeding defined for purposes of this subarticle, see § 79-4-7.40.

Plaintiff bears the burden, pursuant to Miss. Code Ann. § 79-4-7.44(d), of establishing, pursuant to § 79-4-7.44(a), that a special committee’s determination that the maintenance of the derivative proceeding was not in the best interests of the corporation was not made in good faith after it conducted a reasonable inquiry upon which its conclusions were based. If the plaintiff fails to demonstrate lack of good faith after a reasonable inquiry upon which the special committee’s conclusions were based, then the derivative proceeding must be dismissed. Burgess v. Patterson, 188 So.3d 537, 2016 Miss. LEXIS 154 (Miss. 2016).

Plaintiff failed to demonstrate that a special committee’s decision that the maintenance of the derivative suit was not in the best interests of the corporation was not made in good faith after it had conducted a reasonable inquiry. Therefore, the circuit court was not in error for granting dismissal to the corporation Burgess v. Patterson, 188 So.3d 537, 2016 Miss. LEXIS 154 (Miss. 2016).

Because plaintiff did not allege with particularity facts establishing that the members of a special committee were not qualified, dismissal of plaintiff’s derivative action was appropriate. Burgess v. Patterson, 188 So.3d 537, 2016 Miss. LEXIS 154 (Miss. 2016).

Propriety of termination of properly initiated derivative action by “independent committee” appointed by board of directors whose actions (or inaction) are under attack.
22 A.L.R.4th 1206.

§79-4-7.45.
Court approval for settlement or discontinuance.

A derivative proceeding may not be discontinued or settled without the court’s approval. If the court determines that a proposed discontinuance or settlement will substantially affect the interests of the corporation’s shareholders or a class of shareholders, the court shall direct that notice be given to the shareholders affected.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 368, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

Derivative proceeding defined for purposes of this subarticle, see § 79-4-7.40.

This section, not foreign law, to govern matters arising hereunder in derivative proceeding involving foreign corporation, see § 79-4-7.47.

Notice to shareholders and court approval of dismissal or compromise of derivative actions, under
Rule 23.1 of Federal Rules of Civil Procedure.26 A.L.R. Fed. 465.

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 2127.

§79-4-7.46.
Expenses and attorney fees.

On termination of the derivative proceeding the court may:

Order the corporation to pay the plaintiff’s reasonable expenses (including attorney fees) incurred in the proceeding if it finds that the proceeding has resulted in a substantial benefit to the corporation; or

Order the plaintiff to pay any defendant’s reasonable expenses (including attorney fees) incurred in defending the proceeding if it finds that the proceeding was commenced or maintained without reasonable cause or for an improper purpose.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 368, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

Derivative proceeding defined for purposes of this subarticle, see § 79-4-7.40.

This section, not foreign law, to govern matters arising hereunder in derivative proceeding involving foreign corporation, see § 79-4-7.47.

Although a shareholder may bring suit against other shareholders in the name of the corporation, there is no authority whereby the suit can be prosecuted at the cost of the corporation unless the action is successful. Wyssbrod v. Wittjen, 798 So. 2d 352, 2001 Miss. LEXIS 23 (Miss. 2001).

The statute does not provide authority to order an attorney to disgorge corporate funds improperly paid as attorney’s fees. Wyssbrod v. Wittjen, 798 So. 2d 352, 2001 Miss. LEXIS 23 (Miss. 2001).

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 2147 et seq.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Forms 221 et seq. (petition, notice, motion, affidavit and order, for attorney’s fees).

§79-4-7.47.
Law applicable in derivative proceedings involving foreign corporations.

In any derivative proceeding in the right of a foreign corporation, the matters covered by this subchapter shall be governed by the laws of the jurisdiction of incorporation of the foreign corporation except for Sections 79-4-7.43, 79-4-7.45 and 79-4-7.46.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 368, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

Derivative proceeding defined for purposes of this subarticle, see § 79-4-7.40.

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 2052.

§79-4-7.48.
Shareholder action to appoint custodian or receiver.

The chancery court of the county where a corporation’s principal office is located, or the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state, may appoint one or more persons to be custodians, or, if the corporation is insolvent, to be receivers, of and for a corporation in a proceeding by a shareholder where it is established that:

The directors are deadlocked in the management of the corporate affairs, the shareholders are unable to break the deadlock, and irreparable injury to the corporation is threatened or being suffered; or

The directors or those in control of the corporation are acting fraudulently and irreparable injury to the corporation is threatened or being suffered.

Has jurisdiction over the corporation and all of its property, wherever located.

The court:

May issue injunctions, appoint a temporary custodian or temporary receiver with all the powers and duties the court directs, take other action to preserve the corporate assets wherever located, and carry on the business of the corporation until a full hearing is held;

Shall hold a full hearing, after notifying all parties to the proceeding and any interested persons designated by the court, before appointing a custodian or receiver; and

The court may appoint an individual or domestic or foreign corporation (authorized to transact business in this state) as a custodian or receiver and may require the custodian or receiver to post bond, with or without sureties, in an amount the court directs.

The court shall describe the powers and duties of the custodian or receiver in its appointing order, which may be amended from time to time. Among other powers,

A custodian may exercise all of the powers of the corporation, through or in place of its board of directors, to the extent necessary to manage the business and affairs of the corporation; and

A receiver (i) may dispose of all or any part of the assets of the corporation wherever located, at a public or private sale, if authorized by the court; and (ii) may sue and defend in the receiver’s own name as receiver in all courts of this state.

The court during a custodianship may redesignate the custodian a receiver, and during a receivership may redesignate the receiver a custodian, if doing so is in the best interests of the corporation.

The court from time to time during the custodianship or receivership may order compensation paid and expense disbursements or reimbursements made to the custodian or receiver from the assets of the corporation or proceeds from the sale of its assets.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 361, § 7; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 29, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, rewrote (a).